Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 24
ELECTRIC AND STREET RAILROADS

Section

40-24-101. Street railway - consent necessary.

Nothing in articles 20 to 33 of this title shall be construed to allow the construction of any street or other railroad or other structure or substructure for any purpose on, below, or elevated above the surface of the ground of any street or alley within the limits of any such city or town by any corporation or person without the consent of the local authorities of such city or town; but no such consent, however enacted or expressed, on any consideration whatever shall operate to relieve or protect any person or corporation constructing any such street or other railroad or structure or substructure against any claim for damages to private property which otherwise, without such consent, might be lawfully maintained against such person or corporation.

Source:

G.L.

§ 219.

G.S.

§ 266.

L. 1885:

p. 152, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5420.

C.L.

§ 2823.

CSA:

C. 139, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1240, § 2, effective July 1.

40-24-102. Grant right-of-way - condemnation.

The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties in the state of Colorado, with the written consent of a majority of the holders of property (measured by the front foot) abutting on each side of such county roads, have the power to grant to any person, company, corporation, or association outside of cities and towns the right-of-way and franchise for the construction, operation, or maintenance of any electric railroad over, along, and across any county road in their respective counties, upon the terms and conditions provided in section 40-24-103; and, when necessary to enter upon and use private property in the construction and operation of such roads, such person, company, corporation, or association has the same power of operation and condemnation that the railroad companies have.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 407, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5432.

C.L.

§ 2836.

CSA:

C. 139, § 22.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-2.

Cross references:

For condemnation of rights-of-way, see article 2 of title 38.

40-24-103. Petition for right-of-way.

Any person, company, corporation, or association desiring in good faith to construct, maintain, and operate an electric railroad over, along, or across any county road within any county in this state may petition the board of county commissioners of such county for a franchise and right-of-way for the construction, maintenance, and operation of an electric railroad. The board of county commissioners, in accordance with the conditions provided in this section, may grant said right-of-way and franchise for a period not exceeding twenty years. Before any such person, company, association, or corporation commences the construction of any such electric railroad, there shall be filed with and approved by the board of county commissioners of any such county specifications and surveys with maps, showing all grades and curves of such proposed line of road, together with the exact location and description of all tracks, culverts, bridges, and poles, and the difference, if any, in all grades between such county road and the said proposed line of railroad. Before such specifications, surveys, or maps shall be so approved, at least ten days' public notice of the filing thereof shall be given by such board of county commissioners by publication in some newspaper of general circulation in such county and by the posting of a copy thereof in the office of the county clerk and recorder of such county.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 407, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5433.

C.L.

§ 2837.

CSA:

C. 139, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-3.

40-24-104. Railroad to maintain and keep joint road and bridges in good repair.

Any person, company, corporation, or association to whom any such right-of-way and franchise is granted shall construct and maintain its railroad on either side of the county road, and, at its own expense and in good substantial manner, shall strengthen and repair all bridges and culverts on said county road which are used or occupied jointly by said electric railroad and the traveling public, and, thereafter during the existence of said franchise, shall contribute and pay not less than one-half of the necessary expense of keeping said bridges and culverts in good repair, and shall pay all expense of keeping public and private crossings planked and in good repair, and, at its own expense, shall widen to not less than twenty-four feet all bridges, culverts, cuts, and embankments on said public highway which are used or occupied jointly by said electric railroad and the traveling public.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 408, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 5434.

C.L.

§ 2838.

CSA:

C. 139, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-4.

40-24-105. New bridges - construction and maintenance.

Whenever it becomes necessary to build or construct any new bridges or culverts on any county road over or along which any person, company, corporation, or association is operating and maintaining an electric railroad, said person, company, corporation, or association shall pay to the party constructing or erecting the same one-half of the expense for the erection and construction of the bridges or culverts which are used jointly by the public and said railroad and shall thereafter pay one-half of the necessary expense of keeping said bridges or culverts used jointly by the public and said railroad in good repair; and the county in which said county road is situated shall contribute and pay out of the county road fund the other one-half of the expense for the construction and maintenance thereafter of any such culverts or bridges. Said bridges or culverts shall be constructed under the joint supervision of the owner or operator of said electric railroad and the board of county commissioners of such county.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 409, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 5435.

C.L.

§ 2839.

CSA:

C. 139, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-5.

40-24-106. Width of joint bridges.

Any bridge or culvert constructed upon any county road or public highway which is to be used jointly by any electric railroad and the traveling public shall not be less than twenty-four feet in width.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 409, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 5436.

C.L.

§ 2840.

CSA:

C. 139, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-6.

40-24-107. Forfeiture of right-of-way - cause.

Whenever any person, company, corporation, or association obtains a franchise and right-of-way to operate an electric railroad over or along any county road in any county in this state and fails, refuses, or neglects, for a period of six months after the granting of any such franchise, to commence the work of constructing such electric railroad and in good faith to continuously prosecute the construction thereof to a final completion or fails, refuses, or neglects to operate or maintain said railroad in good condition and in good faith, for a period of one year at any one time after the granting of said franchise or right-of-way, such person, company, corporation, or association or its assigns shall forfeit all its right, title, and interest in and to such franchise and right-of-way, and the same shall become null and void; and it shall be the duty of the board of county commissioners of the county granting such franchise and the district attorney of the judicial district in which the county is situated to immediately institute the proper legal proceedings to cancel said franchise and all right, title, and interest of said person, company, corporation, or association or its assigns to use or occupy any portion of said county road.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 409, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 5437.

C.L.

§ 2841.

CSA:

C. 139, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-7.

Cross references:

For the penalty for failure of railroad company to commence construction, see § 40-20-105.

40-24-108. Railroad subject to assignment.

Any person, company, corporation, or association obtaining any right-of-way or franchise to construct, operate, and maintain an electric railroad along, over, and across any county road within such county has the right to assign and transfer such franchise and right-of-way to any other person, company, corporation, or association, and the person, company, corporation, or association taking such franchise and right-of-way shall be subject to all the requirements and provisions of sections 40-24-102 to 40-24-108.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 410, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 5438.

C.L.

§ 2842.

CSA:

C. 139, § 28.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-8.

40-24-109. Protection of employees from weather. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 379, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5439.

C.L.

§ 2843.

CSA:

C. 139, § 29.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-9.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-24-110. Motormen to have unobstructed view - trailing car excepted. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 379, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5440.

C.L.

§ 2844.

CSA:

C. 139, § 30.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-10.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.

40-24-111. Each day an offense - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 01:

p. 380, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 5441.

C.L.

§ 2845.

CSA:

C. 139, § 31.

CRS 53:

§ 116-5-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-5-11.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 219, § 8, effective March 29.